Maine, session 132, LD2198.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1730-B is enacted to read:
§1730-B. Limit on debt-to-equity ratio in transactions with health care entities
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Health care entity" means a health care provider, a health care facility or a provider
organization. "Health care entity" does not include a nursing facility as defined in
section 328, subsection 18.
B. "Health care facility" means a licensed institution providing health care services or
a health care setting, including, but not limited to, hospitals and other licensed inpatient
facilities; health systems consisting of one or more health care entities that are jointly
owned or managed; ambulatory surgical or treatment centers; residential treatment
centers; diagnostic, laboratory and imaging centers; freestanding emergency facilities;
outpatient clinics; and rehabilitation and other therapeutic health settings.
C. "Health care provider" means a person, corporation, partnership, governmental unit,
state institution, medical practice or other entity qualified or licensed under state law
to perform or provide health care services to persons in the State.
D. "Provider organization" means any corporation, partnership, business trust,
association or organized group of persons that is in the business of health care delivery
or management, whether incorporated or not, that represents one or more health care
providers in contracting with carriers for the payment of health care services. "Provider
organization" includes, but is not limited to, physician organizations, physician-
hospital organizations, independent practice associations, health care provider
networks, accountable care organizations and management services organizations and
any other organization that contracts with carriers for payment for health care services.
2. Debt-to-equity ratio. A person may not enter into any transaction with a health care
entity in the State in which the ratio of debt to equity for the health care entity exceeds
50%.